Washington statutes.
RCW 36.70.470

Planning agency—Promotion of public interest in plan.

Each planning agency shall endeavor to promote public interest in, and understanding of, the comprehensive plan and its purpose, and of the official controls related to it.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.70.470. Prior: 1959 c 201 s 47.]